Missouri, session 2026, HB3506.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 290.235, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 290.235, to read as follows:
290.235. 1. Employers may use entry-level workers and federally registered
apprentices for on-the-job training periods. The wage rate for on-the-job training workers
shall be equal to fifty percent of the applicable wage rate for a journeyman worker under the
appropriate occupational title for a specific locality.
2. The combined total of entry-level workers and federally registered apprentices
shall not exceed a one-to-one ratio with the number of journeyman workers in any
occupational title on a public works project subject to sections 290.210 to 290.340.
3. For any public works project for which the bid accepted by the public body
for the total project cost is in the amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more,
the public body awarding the contract shall cause to be inserted in the contract a
stipulation that at least one federally registered apprentice shall perform work under
the contract.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.